Arkansas, session 2025, HB1632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 42, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-42-131. Reimbursement for free or discounted licenses.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Revenue from hunting and fishing licenses is a crucial
element for funding state fish and wildlife agencies’ conservation efforts
across the nation;
(2) However, well-intentioned programs to offer free and
discounted licenses to certain qualified individuals and groups have the
potential to reap deteriorative effects on the agencies’ budgets;
(3) To prevent the loss of sportsmen-generated dollars for
conservation funding, some states have enacted legislation to require
reimbursements to the state fish and wildlife agencies from the general funds
for any free and discounted licenses; and
*CRH074*
03-19-2025 15:43:44 CRH074

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/19/25 HB1632
(4) The state needs to take action to ensure the conservation
efforts of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission are protected.
(b)(1) The commission shall be reimbursed for lost revenue resulting
from the issuance of free or partially discounted annual resident combination
sportsman hunting and fishing licenses created by statute on or after the
effective date of this act in an amount equal to the discounts received.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section also shall apply to lost
revenue resulting from exemptions to licensure requirements created by
statute on or after the effective date of this act in an amount equal to the
amount of lost revenue from the exemptions.
(c) The commission shall:
(1) Maintain an accounting of lost revenue under subsection (b)
of this section; and
(2) Submit the accounting required under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section to the Department of Finance and Administration for the payment
of moneys in an amount equal to lost revenue out of the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund on or before June 30 of each fiscal year.
(d) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of the accounting from the
commission, the department shall deposit the amount of lost revenue for the
previous fiscal year into the Game Protection Fund.
(e) The accounting required by subdivision (c)(1) of this section and
any other records relating to the accounting shall be subject to audit by
Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(f) Any reimbursement to the commission for lost revenue under
subdivision (b) of this section shall be made from the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund subject to an appropriation by the General Assembly.

/s/Wardlaw








03-19-2025 15:43:44 CRH074